Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 401.651 is amended to read:
401.651. As used in ORS 401.651 to 401.670:
(1) “Health care facility” means a  health care facility as defined in ORS 442.015 that has been
licensed under ORS chapter 441.
(2) “Health care provider” means[ :]
[(a)] an individual licensed, certified or otherwise  authorized or permitted by the laws of this
state or  another state to administer health care services in the ordinary course of business or
practice of a profession[ ; and ].
[(b) A person entered in the emergency health care provider registry under ORS 401.658. ]
(3) “Health professional regulatory  board” means a health professional regulatory board, as de-
fined in ORS 676.160, the Long Term Care Administrators Board, the Board of Licensed Dietitians
and the Behavior Analysis Regulatory Board.
(4) “Support and administrative personnel” means an individual who is not a  health care
provider, and who works to enable the provision of health care or public health services, in-
cluding medical or nonmedical operations support, management or administration.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 401.654 is amended to read:
401.654. (1) The Oregon Health  Authority may establish [ an emergency health care provider ] a
volunteer registry that includes [ emergency] health care providers  and support  and administra-
tive personnel who are available to  provide health care , public health and supportive  services
[during an  emergency or crisis ] on a voluntary basis . As a condition of inclusion in the registry,
the authority may require:
(a) Training related to the provision of health care , public health or other  services [ in an
emergency or crisis ] as a condition of registration; [ and]
(b) Criminal background checks for applicants and persons who have been registered[ .]; and
(c) Screenings of physical health, emotional health or immunization status in order to
assign appropriate duties without increased health-related risks.
(2) The authority [ shall] may  issue identification cards  to [ health care providers ] individuals
entered in the [ emergency health care provider ] registry established under this section that:
(a) Identify the [ health care provider ] individual;
Enrolled Senate Bill 837 (SB 837-A) Page 1
(b) Indicate that the [ health care provider ] individual is registered [ as an Oregon emergency
health care provider ] in the registry established under this section ;
(c) Identify [ the] any  license or certification held by the [ health care provider ] individual, or
previously held by the [ health care provider ] individual if the [ health care provider ] individual is
entered in the [ emergency health care provider ] registry [ under] pursuant to  ORS 401.658; and
(d) Identify the [ health care provider’s ] individual’s usual area of practice, and the types of
[health care ] services  that  the [ health care provider ] individual is authorized to provide, if that in-
formation is available and the authority determines that it is  appropriate to provide that informa-
tion.
(3) The  authority by rule [ shall] may  establish a form for identification cards issued under
subsection (2) of this section.
(4) The authority shall support and provide assistance to the Oregon Department  of Emergency
Management in emergencies  or crises involving the public health or requiring emergency medical
response.
(5) The  authority may enter into agreements with other states to facilitate the registry of out-
of-state health care providers  and support and administrative personnel  in  the [ emergency health
care provider ] registry established under this section.
SECTION 3.  ORS 401.657 is amended to read:
401.657. (1) The Oregon Health Authority may designate  all or part of a health care facility or
other location as an emergency health care center. If the Governor  declares a state of emergency
under ORS 401.165, or declares a state of public health emergency  under ORS 433.441, emergency
health care centers may be used for:
(a) Evaluation and referral of individuals affected by the emergency;
(b) Provision of health care services; and
(c) Preparation of patients for transportation.
(2) The Oregon Health Authority  may enter into cooperative agreements with a local public
health authority, as defined in ORS 431.003, that allow  the local public health authority to designate
emergency health care centers under this section.
(3) An emergency health care center designated under this section must have  an emergency
operations plan and a credentialing plan  that governs the use of [ emergency health care providers ]
individuals registered under ORS 401.654 and other health care providers who volunteer to perform
health care services at the center under ORS 401.651  to 401.670. The emergency operations plan and
credentialing plan must comply with  rules governing those plans adopted by the Oregon Health
Authority.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 401.658 is amended to read:
401.658. (1) The Oregon Health Authority may include  in the [ emergency health care provider ]
registry established under  ORS 401.654 a person who was previously licensed, certified or otherwise
authorized to provide health care services in Oregon by a health professional regulatory board if:
(a) The person  was licensed, certified or otherwise authorized to provide health care services
not more than 10 years before entry in the registry; and
(b) The person meets such other criteria as may be established by the authority.
(2) Notwithstanding  any other law prohibiting a person from providing health care services
without a license, certificate  or other authorization from a health professional regulatory board, a
person entered in the [ emergency health care provider ] registry under subsection  (1) of this section
may provide health care services during a state of  emergency declared under ORS 401.165 or a state
of public  health emergency declared under ORS 433.441 without a license, certification or other
authorization if:
(a) The person is in compliance with all rules adopted by the authority  for persons providing
health care services under this section; and
(b) The authority has directed the person to provide health care services under ORS 401.661 (1).
Enrolled Senate Bill 837 (SB 837-A) Page 2
(3) The authority may adopt rules, after consulting with  the appropriate health professional
regulatory boards, that establish criteria and requirements for including persons in  the [ emergency
health care provider ] registry under this section, including but not limited to:
(a) Educational requirements;
(b) Training requirements;
(c) Verification  of previous licenses, certifications or other authorization by a health profes-
sional regulatory board;
(d) Verification that the previous licenses, certifications or other authorization  of the person
was not revoked by reason of unprofessional conduct or any other reason that would  affect the
person’s ability to safely provide health care services; and
(e) Limitations on the type of health care services that may be provided by the person under this
section and the places at which those services may be provided.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 401.661 is amended to read:
401.661. [ If the Governor declares a state of emergency under ORS 401.165 or declares a state of
public health emergency under ORS 433.441: ]
(1) The Oregon Health Authority, in conjunction with the  Department of Human Services for
facilities licensed by the department, may direct [ emergency health care providers ] individuals reg-
istered under ORS  401.654 who are willing to provide [ health care ] volunteer  services to proceed
to any place  in this state where [ health care ] such services are required [ by reason of the emergency
or crisis; ].
(2) Pursuant to the Emergency Management Assistance Compact and the  Pacific Northwest
Emergency Management Arrangement, the Oregon  Health Authority may direct [ emergency health
care providers ] individuals registered under  ORS 401.654 who are willing to provide [ health care ]
volunteer services in another [ state] jurisdiction to proceed to another [ state] jurisdiction where
[emergency health care ] such  services are required by reason of an emergency in that [ state; and ]
jurisdiction. Individuals registered under ORS 401.654 are officers of the state for  purposes
of the Emergency Management Assistance Compact.
(3) If the Governor declares  a state of emergency under ORS 401.165 or declares a state
of public health emergency under ORS 433.441, any [ emergency health care provider ] individual
registered under ORS 401.654 or [ other] any  health care provider may volunteer to perform [ health
care] services described in ORS 401.657 at any emergency health care center  or health care facility
in the manner provided by ORS 401.664.
SECTION 6.  ORS 401.664 is amended to read:
401.664. (1) [ Emergency health care providers ] Individuals registered under ORS 401.654  and
[other] health  care providers who volunteer to perform [ health care ] services under ORS 401.651 to
401.670 must provide those services in accordance with  the emergency operations plan and creden-
tialing plan adopted by the emergency health care center or [ by] the health  care facility at which
the services are rendered.
(2) An emergency health care center or health care facility may determine the services to be
provided by any [ emergency health care provider ] individual registered under ORS 401.654 or
[other] any health care provider who volunteers to perform health care services under  ORS 401.651
to 401.670.
SECTION 7.  ORS 401.667 is amended to read:
401.667. [(1) If the Governor declares a state of emergency under ORS 401.165, or  declares a state
of public health  emergency under ORS 433.441, emergency health care providers registered under ORS
401.654 and other health  care providers who volunteer to perform health care services under ORS
401.651 to 401.670 are agents of the state under ORS 30.260 to 30.300 for the purposes of any claims
arising out of services that are provided under ORS 401.651 to 401.670 pursuant  to directions from a
public body and that are within  the course and scope of the health care provider’s duties, without re-
gard to whether the health care provider is compensated for the services. ]
(1)(a) Individuals registered under  ORS 401.654 and health care providers who volunteer
to perform health care services under ORS 401.661 are agents of the state under ORS  30.260
Enrolled Senate Bill 837 (SB 837-A) Page 3
to 30.300 for the purposes of any claims arising out of services that are provided under  ORS
401.661 pursuant to directions from a  public body and that are within the course and scope
of the individual’s duties, without regard to whether  the individual is compensated for the
services.
(b) If the Governor declares a state of emergency under ORS  401.165, or declares a state
of public health emergency under ORS 433.441,  individuals registered under ORS 401.654 and
health care providers who volunteer to  perform health care services under ORS 401.655,
401.656, 401.657 or 401.658 are agents of the state under ORS 30.260 to 30.300 for the purposes
of any claims arising out of services that are provided under ORS 401.655, 401.656,  401.657 or
401.658 pursuant to directions from a  public body and that are within the course and scope
of the individual’s duties, without regard to whether  the individual is compensated for the
services.
(2) If the Governor declares a state of  emergency under ORS 401.165, or declares a state of
public health emergency under ORS 433.441, health care  facilities designated under ORS 401.657 and
other persons operating emergency health care centers designated under ORS 401.657 are  agents
of the state under ORS 30.260 to 30.300 for the purposes of any claims arising  out of services that
are provided  through those centers or facilities under ORS 401.651 to 401.670 pursuant to directions
from a public body and that are within the course and scope of the duties of the health care facility
or other person, without regard to whether the health care facility or  other person is compensated
for the services.
(3) An [ emergency health care provider ] individual registered under ORS 401.654 participating in
training authorized by the Oregon Health Authority under ORS 401.651 to 401.670 is  an agent of the
state under ORS 30.260 to 30.300 for the purposes of any claims arising out of that training.
(4) The provisions  of subsection (2) of this section apply only to emergency health care centers
or health care facilities that have adopted emergency operations plans and credentialing plans  that
govern the use of [ emergency health care providers ] individuals registered under ORS  401.654 and
other health care providers who volunteer to perform health care services under ORS  401.651 to
401.670. An emergency operations plan and a credentialing plan must comply with rules  governing
those plans adopted by the authority.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 656.047 is amended to read:
656.047. (1) The  Oregon Health Authority shall provide workers’ compensation coverage for
[volunteer emergency health care providers ] individuals registered under  ORS 401.654 who are in-
jured in the course and scope of  performing [ emergency health care ] volunteer services if the injury
occurs:
(a) While the [ volunteer] individual is performing [ health care ] services at the  direction of the
authority under ORS 401.661; [ or]
(b) While the [ volunteer] individual is engaged in training being conducted or approved by the
authority for the purpose of preparing the  [ volunteer] individual to perform [ emergency health care ]
services[ .]; or
(c) While the individual is performing services at the direction  of the authority, pursuant
to the Emergency Management Assistance  Compact and the Pacific Northwest Emergency
Management Arrangement, in another jurisdiction  where such services are required by rea-
son of an emergency in that jurisdiction.
(2) Workers’ compensation coverage shall be provided under this  section in the manner provided
by ORS 656.039.
SECTION 9.  ORS 431A.015 is amended to read:
431A.015. (1) Unless the Governor has declared a public health emergency  under ORS 433.441,
the Public Health Director may,  upon approval of the Governor or the designee of the Governor,
take the public health  actions described in subsection (2) of this section if the Public Health Di-
rector determines that:
(a)(A) A communicable disease,  reportable disease, disease outbreak, epidemic or other condition
of public health importance has affected more than one county;
Enrolled Senate Bill 837 (SB 837-A) Page 4
(B) There is an immediate  need for a consistent response from the state in order to adequately
protect the public health;
(C) The  resources of the local public health authority or authorities are likely to be quickly
overwhelmed or unable to effectively manage the required response; and
(D) There is a significant risk to the public health; or
(b) A communicable disease, reportable disease, disease outbreak, epidemic  or other condition
of public health importance is reported in Oregon  and is an issue of significant regional or national
concern or is an issue for which there  is significant involvement from federal authorities requiring
state-federal coordination.
(2) The  Public Health Director, after making the determinations required under subsection (1)
of this section, may take the following public health actions:
(a) Coordinate the public health response across jurisdictions.
(b) Prescribe measures for the:
(A) Identification, assessment and control of  the communicable disease or reportable disease,
disease outbreak, epidemic or other condition of public health importance; and
(B) Allocation and distribution of  antitoxins, serums, vaccines, immunizing agents, antibiotics,
antidotes and other pharmaceutical agents, medical supplies or personal protective equipment.
(c) After consultation with appropriate medical experts, create and require the use  of diagnostic
and treatment guidelines and provide notice  of those guidelines to health care providers, institutions
and facilities.
(d) Require a person  to obtain treatment and use appropriate prophylactic measures to prevent
the introduction or spread of a communicable disease or reportable disease, unless:
(A) The person has a medical diagnosis for which a vaccination is contraindicated; or
(B) The person has a religious or conscientious objection to  the required treatments or
prophylactic measures.
(e) Notwithstanding ORS 332.075, direct a district school board to close  a children’s facility or
school under the jurisdiction of the board. The authority granted to the Public Health  Director un-
der this paragraph supersedes the authority granted to the district  school board under ORS 332.075
to the extent the authority granted to the board is inconsistent  with the authority granted to the
director.
(f) Issue guidelines for private businesses regarding appropriate work restrictions.
(g) Organize public information activities  regarding the public health response to circumstances
described in subsection (1) of this section.
(h) Adopt reporting requirements for, and provide notice of those reporting requirements  to,
health care providers, institutions and  facilities for the purpose of obtaining information directly
related to the public health threat presented.
(i) Take control of antitoxins, serums, vaccines, immunizing agents,  antibiotics, antidotes and
other pharmaceutical agents, medical supplies or personal protective equipment.
(j) Direct and deploy [ emergency health care providers ] volunteers  under ORS 401.661.
(3) The authority granted to the Public  Health Director under this section is not intended to
override the general authority provided to a local public health authority except as  already per-
mitted by law, or under the circumstances described in subsection (1) of this section.
(4) If the Oregon Health Authority adopts temporary rules to implement subsection  (2) of this
section, the rules adopted are not subject to the provisions of ORS 183.335 (6)(a). The authority may
amend the temporary rules adopted under this subsection  as often as is necessary to respond to the
public health threat.
(5) If  it is necessary for the authority to purchase antitoxins, serums, vaccines, immunizing
agents, antibiotics,  antidotes or other pharmaceutical agents, medical supplies or personal protective
equipment, the purchases are not subject to the provisions of ORS chapter 279A, 279B or 279C.
(6) If property is taken under  the authority granted to the Public Health Director under sub-
section (2) of this section, the owner of the property is entitled  to reasonable compensation from the
state.
Enrolled Senate Bill 837 (SB 837-A) Page 5
Passed by Senate June 16, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 24, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 837 (SB 837-A) Page 6